Arkansas, session 2025, HB1589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-15-805(1)(A), concerning the duties of a
county treasurer, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Receive and give receipt for all moneys revenues payable
into the county treasury and to pay and disburse the moneys revenues on
warrants or checks drawn by order of the county court.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-15-805(2)(A), concerning the duties of a
county treasurer, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Refuse payment of any warrant or check that would cause a
deficit balance in any special revenue account without an appropriated
transfer of general funds to cover the deficit, except as provided in this
section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-15-805(2)(B)(ii), concerning the duties
*SSS092*
02/24/2025 2:26:19 PM SSS092

HB1589
of a county treasurer, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) When the grant moneys revenues are received by
the county, the moneys revenues shall be receipted to the proper grant fund
by the county treasurer.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-15-805(3)(C), concerning the duties of a
county treasurer, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The treasurer shall refuse payment of any warrant or
check that would cause a deficit balance of the general fund in aggregate.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-15-806 is amended to read as follows:
14-15-806. Neglect or refusal to pay warrant check.
(a) If any county treasurer shall neglect or refuse to pay any warrant
or check drawn on him or her by order of the county court of his or her
county, having cash available in the fund on which the warrant or check is
drawn, he or she shall forfeit and pay to the holder of the warrant claimant
four (4) times the amount thereof.
(b) The forfeiture may be recovered by a civil action in the name of
the party aggrieved against the treasurer and his or her securities, and the
treasurer shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office and upon
conviction shall be removed from office.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 14-15-809 is amended to read as follows:
14-15-809. Resignation, removal, or death.
If he or she resigns, is removed from office, or dies, a county
treasurer, or his or her executor or administrator, shall immediately make
his or her settlement and deliver to his or her successor in office all
things pertaining to the office, together with all the moneys monetary funds
belonging to the county.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 14-21-102 is amended to read as follows:
14-21-102. Annual financial report of the county.
(a)(1) The clerk of the county court county clerk or county
comptroller and the county treasurer shall make out or cause to be made out a
full and complete annual financial report of the county, in the form of a
statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balances, using the
02/24/2025 2:26:19 PM SSS092

HB1589
financial records of the county clerk and county treasurer, giving:.
(2) As a minimum for each reportable fund, the annual financial
report of the county shall provide:
(A) The treasurer's report of the beginning January 1 cash
balance of each fund;
(B) The treasurer's report as to the amount of revenue for
each fund from each source classification;
(C) The treasurer's report as to the ending December 31
cash balance of each fund;
(D) The county clerk's report as to the amount expended
during the fiscal year for all purposes expenditures for all purposes for
each fund for the fiscal year from the county clerk's summary of expenditures
report or the county comptroller's summary expenditure report; and
(E) A detailed statement of the bonded indebtedness and
short-term indebtedness of the county.
(2) (3)(A) The annual county financial report of the county
shall include all operating accounts of the county for which the quorum court
has appropriating control.
(B) The requirement under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section may be satisfied by presenting the annual financial report of the
county with:
(i) Revenues and expenditures for the general fund,
the road fund, and the other funds of the county in the aggregate; and
(ii) Changes in fund balances between January 1 and
December 31.
(3) The (4)(A) If the county clerk or county comptroller is
compiling the annual financial report of the county, the county treasurer
shall submit all revenue reports required under this section to the clerk of
the county court county clerk or county comptroller by March 1.
(B) If the county treasurer is compiling the annual
financial report of the county, the county clerk or county comptroller shall
submit all expenditure reports required under this section to the county
treasurer by March 1.
(b)(1)(A) The clerk of the county court county clerk or county
treasurer shall publish the annual financial report of the county:
(i) One (1) time in one (1) newspaper published in
02/24/2025 2:26:19 PM SSS092

HB1589
the county; and
(ii) On a website owned or maintained by the county,
the state, or the Association of Arkansas Counties.
(B) If a newspaper is not published in the county, the
clerk of the county court county clerk or county treasurer shall publish the
annual financial report of the county one (1) time in the newspaper having
the largest circulation in the county.
(2)(A) The annual financial report shall be published by March
15 of each year for the previous fiscal year of the county in accordance with
§ 14-71-101.
(B) A report published under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this
section is not required to include any revenue or expenditure accruals for
the months of January and February following the calendar fiscal year.
(c) All costs associated with the publication of the annual financial
report of the county shall be charged to the budget of the county treasurer.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 14-24-121(a), concerning the electronic
transfer of county funds, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A disbursement of county funds used for a payment to a federal or
state governmental entity or to a creditor by order of a court of competent
jurisdiction may be made by electronic funds transfer if the:
(1) Claim has been submitted and approved through the county
claim process; and
(2) Disbursement includes adequate supporting documentation.












02/24/2025 2:26:19 PM SSS092